Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-328
Commission; acquire site for headquarters; consent of Governor.

The commission, with the consent of the Governor, may, out of funds appropriated for that purpose, acquire a site in Lincoln and erect thereon one or more buildings to serve the commission as a state headquarters.

Laws 1965, c. 554, § 1, p. 1832;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-805.03;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 86.